Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.08 RCW to read as follows:The legislature recognizes the recent proliferation of electric motorcycle use statewide, especially among teenagers and young adults. The legislature also recognizes that there is a growing need to focus on the differences between electric-assisted bicycles and electric motorcycles to provide a clear means of regulating each type of vehicle. While this work is occurring, the legislature recognizes that the current definitions of "motorcycle" and "moped" apply to many of the vehicles excluded from the "electric-assisted bicycle" definition in RCW 46.04.169.Sec. 2. RCW 46.04.169 and 2018 c 60 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) "Electric-assisted bicycle" means a bicycle with two or three wheels, a saddle, fully operative pedals for human propulsion, and an electric motor. The electric-assisted bicycle's electric motor must have a power output of no more than ((seven hundred fifty))750 watts. The electric-assisted bicycle must meet the requirements of one of the following three classifications:(((1)))(a) "Class 1 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle in which the motor provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of ((twenty))20 miles per hour;(((2)))(b) "Class 2 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle in which the motor may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle and is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of ((twenty))20 miles per hour; or(((3)))(c) "Class 3 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle in which the motor provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of ((twenty-eight))28 miles per hour and is equipped with a speedometer.(2) "Electric-assisted bicycle" does not include:(a) Any vehicle capable of exceeding 20 miles per hour on solely its electric motor; or(b) Any vehicle that is designed, manufactured, or intended by the manufacturer or seller to be easily configured in order not to meet the requirements of an electric-assisted bicycle, whether by a mechanical switch or button, by changing a setting in software controlling the drive system, by use of an online application, or through other means intended by the manufacturer or seller.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) The legislature recognizes the recent proliferation of electric motorcycle use statewide, especially among teenagers and young adults. The legislature also recognizes that there is currently no state regulatory framework that has specifically been developed for such vehicles.(2)(a) The department of licensing must convene a work group to study and recommend a revised statutory framework for electric motorcycles. The department may contract with a third-party consultant for work group support and drafting the new statutory framework.(b) The work group must consist of, but is not limited to, the following members:(i) The secretary of the department of transportation or the secretary's designee;(ii) The executive director of the Washington traffic safety commission or the executive director's designee;(iii) The chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's designee;(iv) A representative from the Cooper Jones active transportation safety council;(v) A representative of the association of Washington cities;(vi) A representative of the Washington state association of counties;(vii) A representative of a nonprofit organization specializing in active transportation or electric bicycle safety;(viii) A representative of a nonprofit organization with expertise in electric bicycles;(ix) A representative of a statewide association representing parks and recreation;(x) A representative of a trails organization that represents nonmotorized users who have encountered motor-powered vehicles on nonmotorized trails;(xi) A representative of a nonprofit motorcycle organization or a motorcycle rider;(xii) A representative of a tribal government or a tribal government designee;(xiii) A representative of a statewide organization directly engaged in recreational electric motorcycle use; and(xiv) Any other representative deemed necessary by the department of licensing.(c) The work group must address the following framework components:(i) How electric motorcycles should be defined or classified, and any new definitions for or modifications needed to other similarly defined vehicle or mobility types;(ii) The extent to which electric motorcycles should be subject to annual registration and license fees, and if driver licensing examinations should include an electric bicycle or motorcycle component;(iii) The extent to which the operation of an electric motorcycle should be subject to mandatory driver education requirements, driver's license or permit requirements, or a minimum age requirement;(iv) Appropriate rules of the road or equipment requirements for electric motorcycles;(v) Opportunities for consistent enforcement of electric motorcycle rules of the road and equipment requirements;(vi) Exploration of the establishment of civil infractions that may be imposed by local jurisdictions on juveniles between the ages of 12 and 16 that may be adjudicated in courts of limited jurisdiction to avoid impacts on juvenile court operations;(vii) Exploration of the establishment of civil penalties for adults who provide electric motorcycles to juveniles less than 16 years of age;(viii) Appropriate penalties for deceptive electric bicycle marketing practices and electric bicycle tampering;(ix) The extent to which electric bicycle manufacturers and vendors should provide disclosure statements or notices to consumers regarding the type of vehicle being purchased; and(x) Any other study component deemed necessary by the work group.(d) The work group must submit an interim report consisting of recommendations and draft legislation for (c)(i) of this subsection, as well as related recommendations for (c)(ii) through (iv) of this subsection, to the office of the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2026. The work group must submit a final report, including any recommendations or draft legislation, to the office of the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by October 31, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. Section 3 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---